New Jersey, session 221, A3180.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  (1)  The department shall not charge a fee for a mobile sportfishing vehicle permit, when issued to a resident of New Jersey who is a veteran, active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, former or current member of the New Jersey National Guard or Reserve, or volunteer emergency worker, for a vehicle registered in the name of the veteran; provided, however, no such person shall be eligible to hold more than one free mobile sportfishing vehicle permit at any given time. (2)   The department shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act, including but not limited to, rules and regulations prescribing the types of evidence that may be used to demonstrate a person is eligible for the benefits of  paragraph (1) of this subsection. b.    Except as otherwise provided in subsection a. of this section, a resident of New Jersey who is a veteran, active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States, former or current member of the New Jersey National Guard or Reserve, or volunteer emergency worker who applies for a mobile sportfishing vehicle permit shall be subject to the same laws, rules, and regulations applicable to other applicants for the issuance of a mobile sportfishing vehicle permit. c.     As used in this section: Emergency service organization means a fire or first aid organization, whether organized as a volunteer or part-paid fire company, fire department, or fire district, or duly incorporated volunteer first aid and emergency or volunteer ambulance or rescue squad association. Mobile sportfishing vehicle permit means a permit of any type, class, or duration which is made available by the department to allow for the operation of a motor vehicle on a beach for the purpose of fishing. Veteran means a person who has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any honorably discharged member of the American Merchant Marine who served during World War II and is declared by the United States Department of Defense to be eligible for federal veterans benefits. Volunteer emergency worker means an unpaid volunteer who serves on an active basis as a member of an emergency service organization. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.